Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1547.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Retail Establishment Bag Prohibition Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development."Exempted bag." Any of the following:(1) A bag used inside a retail establishment by a customer to deliver perishable items to the point-of-sale at 1234567891011121314151617 that establishment, including any of the following:(i) To package bulk items, including fruit, vegetables, nuts, grains or candy.(ii) To contain or wrap meats or fish.(iii) To contain unwrapped prepared foods or bakery goods or to contain or wrap flowers, potted plants or similar items.(iv) To package medications distributed through a pharmacy.(2) A bag sold in packaging containing multiple bags and packaged at the time of manufacture of the bag, including food storage, garbage containment or pet waste collection bags.(3) A bag used by a dry cleaning establishment to protect a customer's garments.(4) A recycled paper bag used by a retail establishment to deliver products directly to a customer."Food instrument." As defined under section 2 of the act of June 10, 2024 (P.L.387, No.22), known as the WIC State Advisory Board Act."Plastic." A synthetic material made from linking monomers through a chemical reaction to create a polymer chain that can be molded or extruded at high heat into various solid forms that retain their defined shapes during their life cycle and after disposal, including material derived from either petrochemicals or a biologically based polymer, including corn or other plant sources."Recycled paper bag." As follows:(1) A paper bag that meets the following:(i) Contains no old growth fiber.20250HB1547PN1824 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Contains a minimum of 40% postconsumer recycled content.(2) The term does not include an exempted bag."Retail establishment." As follows:(1) A location where food or other products are offered to the public for direct sale or delivery to a customer, including the following:(i) A supermarket.(ii) A convenience store.(iii) A service station.(iv) A department store.(v) A discount store.(vi) A clothing store.(vii) A restaurant.(viii) A food truck.(ix) A farmers' market.(x) A delivery service.(2) The term does not include dry-cleaning establishments or pharmacies."Single-use plastic bag." A bag made from plastic that is made through a blown-film extrusion process. The term does not include an exempted bag.Section 3. Retail establishment bag prohibition.(a) Prohibition.--A retail establishment may not provide a single-use plastic bag or a paper bag other than a recycled paper bag to a customer at the retail establishment or through a delivery.(b) Exemption.--The prohibition under subsection (a) and the fee established under section 5(a) shall not apply to an individual making a purchase through the use of a food 20250HB1547PN1824 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 instrument issued under The Pennsylvania Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children.Section 4. Signage requirement.After the effective date of this section until January 31, 2027, a retail establishment shall post conspicuous signage at all customer entrances to the retail establishment or at all points of sale that states the following:(1) Single-use plastic bags and paper bags other than recycled paper bags will no longer be provided by the retail establishment as of the date that the prohibition begins.(2) An explanation of which types of bags and which purchases will be affected by the prohibition.(3) Any other information required by the department.Section 5. Use of recycled paper bags.(a) Recycled paper bags.--A retail establishment may provide a recycled paper bag to a consumer for an additional cost of not less than 10¢ and not more than 25¢ per bag at the point of sale.(b) Retention.--All money collected by a retail establishment under this section for the provision of a recycled paper bag shall be retained by the retail establishment.(c) Charge.--A charge for a recycled paper bag shall be separately stated on a receipt provided to the customer at the time of sale and shall be identified as the "Carry-Out Bag Charge."Section 6. Duties of the department.The department shall:(1) Develop a plan for providing education and engagement of the public concerning the prohibition in this act.20250HB1547PN1824 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act.(3) Develop written guidelines for the implementation of this act. The guidelines shall be in effect until the department promulgates regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this act.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB1547PN1824 - 5 - 12345678